Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-510
Policies; provisions; violations; penalty.

Any company or association, or any officer, agent, or broker thereof, which or who issues or delivers in this state, or to any citizen thereof, any policy in willful violation of the provisions of sections 44-501 to 44-508 shall be punished by a fine not exceeding one hundred dollars for each offense; and the Department of Insurance may revoke the license of any company, association, agent or broker thereof which or who violates any of the provisions of such sections.

Laws 1913, c. 154, § 108, p. 453;

R.S.1913, § 3245;

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. V, art. VII, § 9, p. 634;

C.S.1922, § 7844;

C.S.1929, § 44-609;

R.S.1943, § 44-510.